District of Columbia statutes.
38-403

Use of Franklin School for office purposes.

The Board of Education is authorized to use all necessary floor and room space in the Franklin School Building for office purposes.

History

Mar. 3, 1917, 39 Stat. 1026, ch. 160
June 5, 1920, 41 Stat. 855, ch. 234
Feb. 26, 1925, 43 Stat. 993, ch. 342, § 5

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-203.
1973 Ed., § 31-804.